Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2047.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:



Req. No. 3193 Page 1


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 3-116.2, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 3-116.2. A. Effective January 1, 2013, there is hereby


created the Commission for Educational Quality and Accountability.


The membership of the Commission shall consist of:


1. The Secretary of Education, who shall serve as the chair of


the Commission;


2. One member appointed by the Governor, with the advice and


consent of the Senate, representing business and industry from an


Oklahoma employer with five hundred (500) or fewer employees;


3. One member, appointed by the Governor, with the advice and


consent of the Senate, who is a parent of a child enrolled in a


public school in this state;


4. One member, appointed by the Governor, with the advice and


consent of the Senate, who is an administrator of a public school


district;


5. One member, appointed by the Governor, with the advice and


consent of the Senate, who shall represent higher education teacher


education programs;


6. One member appointed by the Governor, with the advice and


consent of the Senate, who shall be an active classroom teacher in


kindergarten through grade six; and





Req. No. 3193 Page 2


7. One member appointed by the Governor, with the advice and


consent of the Senate, who shall be an active classroom teacher in


grades seven through twelve.


Upon the effective date of this act, the terms of the six


appointed members shall be staggered such that the terms of no more


than two members end in the same year. The terms of the initial


appointed members shall commence on January 1, 2013 July 1, 2028,


and shall end on June 30, 2014 in accordance with designations by


the Governor, with the Governor designating two members whose terms


shall end on June 30, 2030, two members whose terms shall end on


June 30, 2031, and two members whose terms shall end on June 30,


2032. The Thereafter, the Governor shall appoint two members at a


time, and the terms of subsequently appointed members shall commence


on July 1 of each year following the election of the Governor


thereafter and shall be for four (4) years. If a vacancy occurs,


the vacancy shall be filled for the unexpired term in the same


manner as the office was previously filled.


B. A quorum of the Commission, which shall consist of four


members, shall be present in order for the Commission to transact


any business. Members shall be reimbursed for travel in the


performance of their official duties in accordance with the State


Travel Reimbursement Act.


C. Prior to July 1, 2013, the Commission shall meet to organize


and plan for the assumption of the powers and duties of the

Req. No. 3193 Page 3


Education Oversight Board and the Oklahoma Commission for Teacher


Preparation.


D. Beginning July 1, 2013, the Commission shall assume the


following duties:


1. Oversee implementation of the provisions of Enrolled House


Bill No. 1017 of the 1st Extraordinary Session of the 42nd Oklahoma


Legislature;


2. Implementation of the provisions of the Oklahoma Teacher


Preparation Act as provided for in law;


3. Make recommendations to the Governor and Legislature on


methods to achieve an aligned, seamless system from preschool


through postsecondary education; and


4. Set performance levels and corresponding cut scores pursuant


to the Oklahoma School Testing Program Act and as provided for in


Section 1210.541 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title.


E. Beginning July 1, 2013, the Commission shall govern the


operation of the Office of Educational Quality and Accountability


created in Section 3-117 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes this


title.


F. 1. Beginning July 1, 2014, the Commission shall assume the


following duties of the Oklahoma Commission for Teacher Preparation


according to the provisions of the Oklahoma Teacher Preparation Act:


a. approval and accreditation of teacher education


programs, and

Req. No. 3193 Page 4


b. assessment of candidates for licensure and


certification.


2. To implement the provisions of this subsection the


Commission shall:


a. include the State Board of Education in the process,


b. review and assess approved, accredited, and new


programs of teacher education, and


c. encourage studies and research designed to improve


teacher education.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 3-116.5, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 3-116.5. A. On or before October 31, 2021 November 1,


2027, and every three (3) years thereafter, the Commission for


Educational Quality and Accountability shall issue electronically


submit a report to the Speaker of the Oklahoma House of


Representatives, the President Pro Tempore of the Oklahoma State


Senate, and the Governor detailing factors in the public education


system of the state that contribute to improvements in the:


1. Common education system, including, but not limited to, high


school graduation rates and college and career assessment scores;


2. Higher education and career and technology education


systems, including, but not limited to, timely graduation rates and


reduced remediation rates; and



Req. No. 3193 Page 5


3. State workforce, including, but not limited to, career


readiness and the ability for new graduates to find in-state


employment.


B. If the Commission finds there is insufficient information


available to fulfill any of the report objectives specified in


subsection A of this section, the report shall also contain


recommendations on ways to address information gaps between state


entities, such as the State Department of Education, the Oklahoma


Department of Career and Technology Education, and the Oklahoma


State Regents for Higher Education.


C. The Commission may contract with a private consultant or


consultants to assist with the development of the report.


D. The Commission may utilize any funds received including, but


not limited to, any state or federal funds, grants, or private


donations to assist with the development of the report or to assist


the Commission with its general purposes or duties prescribed by


statute.


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 6-211, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 6-211. The Commission for Educational Quality and


Accountability, in cooperation with the State Board of Education in


cooperation with the Commission for Educational Quality and


Accountability, the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education, and


institutions of higher education shall conduct an educator supply-

Req. No. 3193 Page 6


and-demand study every three (3) years. The study shall identify


areas of teacher shortage and make recommendations for addressing


the areas of most critical need. The Board Commission shall


electronically submit a report outlining the findings to the


Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the


President Pro Tempore of the Senate.


SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 1210.531, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1210.531. A. The Commission for Educational Quality


and Accountability shall establish an Oklahoma Educational


Indicators Program. The purpose of the Program shall be to develop


and implement a system of measures whereby the performance of public


schools and school districts is assessed and reported without undue


reliance upon any single type of indicator, and whereby the public,


including students and parents, may be made aware of the proper


meaning and use of any tests administered under the Oklahoma School


Testing Program Act, relative accomplishments of the public schools,


and of progress being achieved. The Commission shall involve


representatives of school teachers and of school administrators in


the development of the Program. The Program shall be so designed


that use of standardized definitions and measures and opportunities


for coordination with national reports, including those of the


National Assessment of Educational Progress, are maximized.



Req. No. 3193 Page 7


B. The Oklahoma Educational Indicators Program shall present


information for comparisons of graduation rates, dropout rates,


pupil-teacher ratios, student enrollment gain and loss rates, and


test results in the contexts of socioeconomic status and the


finances of school districts. Information shall be provided


individually for all public school sites and school districts in a


format that facilitates comparisons. As necessary data become


available, comparisons shall also be provided individually for all


schools and school districts on a historical basis. Reports of all


tests administered pursuant to the Oklahoma School Testing Program


Act shall be a part of the Oklahoma Educational Indicators Program


and shall be provided for each grade and each test subject or set of


competencies. Test results for students enrolled in Internet-based


courses, including regularly enrolled and alternative education


students, shall be disaggregated and reported. The Commission for


Educational Quality and Accountability shall seek to develop and


incorporate additional indicators of comparative standing and


accomplishment.


C. Additionally, the Commission for Educational Quality and


Accountability, with the cooperation of the State Department of


Education, the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education, and the


State Board of Career and Technology Education, shall develop


procedures for obtaining and reporting data to the high schools and


to the general public regarding the performance of each high

Req. No. 3193 Page 8


school’s graduates in Oklahoma’s institutions of higher education in


this state and in postsecondary vocational-technical education. The


Commission shall include workforce outcomes of high school graduates


including postsecondary enrollment, credential attainment,


employment, and earnings information as such data becomes available.


The Commission for Educational Quality and Accountability shall


include such data in the report of the Oklahoma Educational


Indicators Program.


D. By February 1 of each year the Commission for Educational


Quality and Accountability shall publish:


1. A summary report to the people and the Legislature of


Oklahoma of the information provided by the Oklahoma Educational


Indicators Program; and


2. State State-, district district-, and site level site-level


reports which shall include the percentage of students who perform


at the various levels on the tests required by the Oklahoma State


Testing Program.


Immediately following the publication of the reports required in


this subsection each year, all data gathered pursuant to the


Oklahoma Educational Indicators Program shall be made available for


public inspection at the Office of Educational Quality and


Accountability. The confidentiality of individual student records


shall be preserved as required by law.



Req. No. 3193 Page 9


E. In order to carry out the provisions of this section, the


Commission for Educational Quality and Accountability shall be


provided all data and reports necessary to develop and produce the


Oklahoma Educational Indicators Program reports within thirty (30)


days of the necessary data becoming available. Such data shall be


provided directly to the Commission by the State Department of


Education, the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education, the


State Board of Career and Technology Education, the Office of


Management and Enterprise Services, the Oklahoma Employment Security


Commission, and any state contractor or assessment vendor that


maintains or produces necessary data.


F. 1. The State Board of Education shall ensure that any


contracts with assessment vendors include a requirement that the


vendor transmit assessment results and related data files necessary


for the Oklahoma Educational Indicators Program directly to the


Commission for Educational Quality and Accountability at the same


time such results are transmitted to the State Department of


Education.


2. Data required by this subsection shall be provided to the


Commission without the need for a separate data-sharing agreement


with related state agencies and shall be subject to the Oklahoma


Open Records Act; provided, however, that the confidentiality of


individual student records shall be preserved as required by state


and federal law.

Req. No. 3193 Page 10


3. The Commission may contract with an independent third party


to receive, process, and report data submitted pursuant to this


subsection and may receive and expend federal or private grant funds


to carry out its duties pursuant to this section.


SECTION 5. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3193 EB 1/15/2026 11:10:29 AM



































Req. No. 3193 Page 11